Washington statutes.
RCW 18.400.010

Findings—Intent.

(1) The legislature finds that individuals with prior criminal convictions, upon completing the terms of one's sentence, have paid their debt to society, and should be given the opportunity to be regular and productive members of society by seeking gainful employment. Recognizing the perils recidivism poses to the individual, families, public safety, and general well-being, the legislature should prioritize that removal of these barriers which prevent these individuals from entering the workforce.

(2) It is the intent of the legislature to provide a reliable process for individuals with past criminal convictions to apply for a professional license, and to not be prevented from obtaining a professional license due to a prior criminal conviction which does not directly relate to the applicable profession, business, or trade.

[ 2021 c 194 s 1.]